Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1536
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-1536 to 44-1544 shall be known and may be cited as the Unfair Insurance Claims Settlement Practices Act.

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 18.